Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-7606
Association of participating employers or covered individuals; requirements.

A multiple employer welfare arrangement may only be established and maintained by an association of participating employers or covered individuals who are self-employed individuals. The association shall not condition membership in the association, the amounts of dues or other payments for membership, or coverage under a health benefit plan on the basis of health-status-related factors with respect to the covered individuals offered coverage under the health benefit plan. The association shall:

(1) Have been in existence and engaged in substantive activity for its members other than sponsorship of a health benefit plan for more than three years prior to application for a certificate of registration;

(2) Be composed of two or more members, all of which are in the same trade or industry; and

(3) Have, before application for a certificate of registration is made, applications for participation (a) from two or more members who are participating employers with an aggregate of two hundred or more covered individuals or (b) from at least two hundred covered individuals who are self-employed individuals.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB1014, § 5.